en: Spirals of durum wheat
es: Espirales de trigo duro
fr: Spirales de blé dur
hr: Spirale durum pšenice

es: Estrellas de trigo duro
fr: Étoiles de blé dur

es: Farfalle de trigo duro
fr: Farfalles de blé dur, Papillons de blé dur
nl: Durum tarwefarfalle

es: Fideos de trigo duro
fr: Vermicelles de blé dur

es: Fusilli de trigo duro, Hélices de trigo duro
fr: Fusilli de blé dur, Hélices de blé dur, torsades de blé dur
nl: Durum tarwefusilli

en: Durum wheat letters
es: Letras de trigo duro
fr: Lettres de blé dur
hr: Slova durum pšenice

en: Durum wheat macaroni
es: Macarrones de trigo duro
fi: Durumvehnämakaroni
fr: Macaroni de blé dur
hr: Makaroni od durum pšenice
it: Maccheroni di grano duro
nl: Durum tarwemacaronis

en: Durum wheat plates for cannelloni
es: Placas de trigo duro para canelones
fr: Cannelloni de blé dur à garnir
hr: Ploče od durum pšenice za kanelone
nl: Durum tarwecannelonis

en: Durum wheat penne
es: Plumas de trigo duro
fr: Penne de blé dur
hr: Penne od durum pšenice
it: Penne di grano duro
nl: Durum tarwe penne, Penne van durum tarwe

en: Durum wheat noodles
es: Tallarines de trigo duro
fr: Nouilles de blé dur
hr: Rezanci od durum pšenice
nl: Durum tarwe noedels

en: Whole or semi-whole durum wheat pasta
fr: Pâtes de blé dur entier ou semi-entier

es: Pastas de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
nl: Harde Volkorenpastas

en: Whole or semi-whole durum wheat spaghetti
es: Espaguetis de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Spaghetti de blé dur entier ou semi-entier
hr: Špageti od punog ili polucjelovitog zrna durum pšenice
nl: Harde volkorenspaghettis

en: Whole or semi-whole durum wheat stars
es: Estrellas de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Étoiles de blé dur entier ou semi-entier
hr: Zvjezdice od punog ili polucjelovitog zrna durum pšenice

en: Whole or semi-whole durum wheat farfalle
es: Farfalle de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Farfalle de blé dur entières ou semi-entières
hr: Farfalle od cjelovite ili polucjelovite durum pšenice
nl: Volkorenfarfalle

es: Fideos de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Nouilles de blé dur entières ou semi-entières

es: Fideuá de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Fideuá de blé dur entier ou semi-entier

es: Hélices de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Hélices de blé dur entier ou semi-entier

en: Whole or semi-whole durum wheat letters
es: Letras de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Lettres de blé dur entières ou semi-entières
hr: Cjelovita ili polucjelovita durum pšenica slova

es: Macarrones de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
nl: Volkorenmacaronis